California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44311.

The commission shall evaluate any subject matter program offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in satisfaction of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. The evaluation shall be based on standards of program quality and effectiveness, which shall be consistent with the assessments and examinations of subject matter knowledge and competence adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 44282.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 23.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44312.

A finding by the commission of the inadequacy or inappropriateness of such program as the basis for waiving the subject matter examination shall cause persons completing such programs to be ineligible for the examination waiver.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44313.

(a) The subject matter examination authorizing multiple subject classroom instruction may be waived for holders of approved “diversified” or “liberal arts” degrees, or programs or their equivalent, conferred by regionally accredited institutions of higher education approved by the commission.

(b) Notwithstanding the designation of the degrees conferred, the commission shall approve the programs presented by a regionally accredited institution of higher education and shall not engage in the detailed analysis of the applicant’s transcripts for purposes of issuing the credential. The commission, however, may provide for the selected analysis of transcripts to determine whether the
 programs presented by regionally accredited institutions of higher education conform with the requirements of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 24.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44314.

A “diversified” or “liberal arts” program is any program that has been approved by the commission on the basis of standards adopted by the commission.

(a) An approved program shall consist of a minimum of 84 semester units, or equivalent quarter units, including, but not limited to, language studies, literature, mathematics, science, social science, history, humanities, the arts, physical education and human development.

(b) The commission shall establish standards for “diversified” or “liberal arts” programs, or equivalent programs that waive the subject matter examination for multiple subjects instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 832, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Professional Preparation [44320. - 44324.]

44320.

(a) Professional preparation, including student teaching, shall be made available in the upper division course offerings at all California public institutions of higher learning, except the California Maritime Academy and the College of the Law, San Francisco. No more than nine semester units, or the equivalent, of professional education courses may be designated as prerequisites for purposes of admission to student teaching, except that, to satisfy the English language requirement as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, candidates may be required to take 12 semester units, or the equivalent, as professional education prerequisites to student teaching.

(b) The commission shall encourage institutions of higher education that offer programs of professional preparation to collaborate with school districts, county offices of education, and professional organizations in the design and delivery of local programs to function as part of the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Section 44279.2. If local educational agencies and institutions of higher education voluntarily agree to implement the program, the following provisions shall apply to each collaborative effort:

(1) Institutions of higher education and local educational agencies shall coordinate and articulate the program of professional preparation and the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program, so the two programs provide continuity in the preparation, support, and assessment of
 beginning teachers.

(2) At the discretion of an institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort, the program of professional preparation may be submitted to the commission for approval as a program of preparation, support, and assessment that is at least two years long.

(3) In each program of preparation, support, and assessment, the institution of higher education shall make it possible for each candidate to complete all requirements for a valid teaching credential in the equivalent of one year of full-time study.

(4) An institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort may, at its discretion, determine that successful completion of the support and assessment
 components of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment fulfills some or all of the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 44259, and may accordingly recommend applicants for the professional teaching credential. The standards and criteria for making these determinations and recommendations shall be included in the institution’s proposal for a program.

(5) A local educational agency that collaborates, at its own discretion, with an institution of higher education in the design and delivery of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment that meets the standards and criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44279.2, and that receives funds pursuant to the annual Budget Act, may contract with the institution of higher education to pay the institution’s costs of designing
 and delivering the support and assessment components of the program.

(c) Local educational agencies that are approved by the commission to provide programs of personalized preparation to candidates for designated subjects teaching credentials are encouraged to participate in the design and delivery of local programs under the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.2), in a manner consistent with subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Before admission to any professional preparation program approved by the commission for a multiple subject credential, single subject credential, PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, or education specialist credential, a candidate shall provide
 verification to the professional preparation program that one of the following holds true for the candidate:

(A) The candidate holds a valid permit or credential previously issued by the commission.

(B) The candidate has applied for a certificate of clearance from the commission that shall be issued when the commission has verified the candidate’s personal identification and health status.

(2) Before beginning student teaching, clinic practice, or participation in a field experience program as described in Section 44324, a candidate described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall have obtained the certificate of clearance. The fee for the certificate of clearance shall not exceed one-half of the regular fee for
 a credential and shall be deducted from the fee for the initial credential applied for by the certificate holder.

(e) A professional preparation program approved by the commission for a multiple subject credential, single subject credential, PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, or education specialist credential shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Submit candidate profile information to the commission for each enrolled credential candidate within 30 days of the candidate beginning the program.

(B) The candidate profile information shall include, but not be limited to, the candidate’s credential program, type of credential being sought, and preparation pathway, including
 residency, student teaching, internship, or other preparation pathway, as determined by the commission.

(2) Annually update each candidate’s profile information described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to indicate continued enrollment in, or departure from, the program.

(3) Indicate to the commission a candidate’s program completion within 30 days of the candidate completing all credential requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 3.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44320.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the competence and performance of teachers are among the most important factors in influencing the quality and effectiveness of education in elementary and secondary schools.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2008, for a program of professional preparation to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, the program shall include a teaching performance assessment that is aligned with the California Standards for the Teaching Profession and that is congruent with state content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board. In implementing this requirement, institutions or agencies may do the following:

(1) Voluntarily
 develop an assessment for approval by the commission. Approval of any locally developed performance assessment shall be based on assessment quality standards adopted by the commission, which shall encourage the use of alternative assessment methods including portfolios of teaching artifacts and practices.

(2) Participate in an assessment training program for assessors and implement the commission developed assessment.

(c) The commission shall implement the performance assessment in a manner that does not increase the number of assessments required for teacher credential candidates prepared in this state. A candidate shall be assessed during the normal term or duration of the preparation program of the candidate.

(d) Subject to the availability of funds in the annual Budget Act, the commission shall perform all of the
 following duties with respect to the performance assessment:

(1) Assemble and convene an expert panel to advise the commission about performance standards and developmental scales for teaching credential candidates and the design, content, administration, and scoring of the assessment. At least one-third of the panel members shall be classroom teachers in California public schools.

(2) Design, develop, and implement assessment standards and an institutional assessor training program for the sponsors of professional preparation programs to use if they choose to use the commission developed assessment.

(3) Establish a review panel to examine each assessment developed by an institution or agency in relation to the standards set by the commission and advise the commission regarding approval of each assessment system.

(4) Initially and periodically analyze the validity of assessment content and the reliability of assessment scores that are established pursuant to this section.

(5) Establish and implement appropriate standards for satisfactory performance in assessments that are established pursuant to this section.

(6) Analyze possible sources of bias in the performance assessment and act promptly to eliminate any bias that is discovered.

(7) Collect and analyze background information provided by candidates who participate in the performance assessment, and report and interpret the individual and aggregated results of the assessment.

(8) Examine and revise, as necessary, the institutional accreditation
 system pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 44370), for the purpose of providing a strong assurance to teaching candidates that ongoing opportunities are available in each credential preparation program that is offered pursuant to Section 44320, Article 6 (commencing with Section 44310), Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325), or Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3 for candidates to acquire the knowledge, skills, and abilities measured by the assessment system.

(9) Ensure that the aggregated results of the assessment for groups of candidates who have completed a credential program are used as one source of information about the quality and effectiveness of that program. The commission shall report the number of programs with low pass rates and assist these programs to use evidence-based strategies to support candidates to pass the assessment for all administrations of the assessment. There shall be no fees to
 candidates for these instructional supports.

(e) The commission shall ensure that each performance assessment pursuant to subdivision (b) is state approved and aligned with the California Standards for the Teaching Profession and is consistently applied to candidates in similar preparation programs. The commission shall ensure that any approved performance assessment is compliant with this section and meets the commission standards for administration. To the maximum feasible extent, each performance assessment shall be ongoing and blended into the preparation program, and shall produce the following benefits for credential candidates, sponsors of preparation programs, and local educational agencies that employ program graduates:

(1) The performance assessment shall be designed to provide formative assessment information during the preparation program for use by the candidate,
 instructors, and supervisors for the purpose of improving the teaching knowledge, skill, and ability of the candidate.

(2) The performance assessment results shall be reported so that they may serve as one basis for a recommendation by the program sponsor that the commission award a teaching credential to a candidate who has successfully met the performance assessment standards. The commission shall maintain a secondary passing standard for the teaching performance assessment that may be used, with consideration of other evidence of the candidate’s performance related to the California Standards for the Teaching Profession, for a program sponsor’s recommendation of a candidate to the commission for a teaching credential.

(3) The formative assessment information pursuant to paragraph (1) and the performance assessment results pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be reported so that they
 may serve as one basis for the individual induction plan of the new teacher pursuant to Section 44279.2.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that assessments in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), including the administrative costs of the commission, be fully funded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 889, Sec. 2.   (SB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44320.3.

(a) By July 1, 2025, the commission shall ensure that an approved teaching performance assessment for a preliminary multiple subject credential, as required by Section 44320.2, and for a preliminary education specialist credential assesses all candidates for competence in instruction in literacy, including, but not limited to, evidence-based methods of teaching foundational reading skills, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. The commission shall ensure that any competencies assessed pursuant to this section are assessed in a manner aligned to the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, the commission’s standards of program quality and
 effectiveness and current teaching performance expectations, and the current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework adopted by the state board. The commission shall ensure that the assessment meets the commission’s adopted teaching performance assessment design standards for validity, reliability, and sponsor support responsibilities.

(b) Before requiring successful passage of the teaching performance assessment for the preliminary multiple subject teaching credential and the preliminary education specialist credential pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall certify that all of the teacher education programs approved by the commission pursuant to Section 44227 provide instruction in the knowledge, skills, and abilities required in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b)
 of Section 44259.

(c) Commencing on July 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, until the requirements of this section are met, the commission shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on its progress in meeting the requirements of this section and Sections 44259.6 and 44259.7, including how stakeholders were engaged in the process of meeting the requirements of this section and Sections 44259.6 and 44259.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 678, Sec. 9.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44320.4.

(a) To ensure the teaching performance assessments described in Sections 44320.2 and 44320.3 are valid and authentic, formative in nature, embedded in preparation, and inform program improvement through the accreditation system, the commission shall convene a workgroup to assess current design and implementation of the state’s current teaching performance assessments.

(b) The commission shall select classroom teachers, teacher educators, and performance assessment experts to form the workgroup described in subdivision (a). At least one-third of the workgroup members shall be classroom teachers in California public schools. The commission shall not appoint any person to the workgroup with a financial interest in any teacher licensure assessment.
 The commission shall consult with statewide labor organizations and other representative organizations for recommendations of workgroup members.

(c) The workgroup shall develop recommendations to be presented to the commission by March 1, 2025, and the commission shall vote to adopt a set of recommendations by July 1, 2025. Adopted recommendations shall be implemented by July 1, 2028. At a minimum, the recommendations from the workgroup shall include:

(1) An analysis of any modifications needed to current assessments to ensure they are valid and authentic to the work of teaching, reasonable to implement in the wide range of classroom settings across the state, and appropriate for beginning teachers.

(2) Recommendations for how programs might embed the assessments into coursework and clinical work to avoid duplicative
 work for candidates.

(3) Suggested questions for program completer surveys to understand candidate experience of programmatic support for assessment completion.

(4) Recommendations to strengthen the accreditation system to ensure programs embed the assessment in coursework and clinical work, offer sufficient clinical and pedagogical support, and support candidates to pass the assessment.

(5) Recommendations for how programs can engage in local scoring of the assessment to inform program improvement.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall report to the Legislature annually, beginning on October 15, 2025, and through October 15, 2028, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the progress of
 the workgroup in making its recommendations and actions taken by the commission to implement the recommendations it adopts.

(e) Meetings of the workgroup are subject to the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 889, Sec. 3.   (SB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44320.5.

For the 2024–25 fiscal year only, the commission shall submit to the Department of Finance a plan for using existing funds available from the Teacher Credentials Fund to support the operations of the workgroup pursuant to Section 44320.4. Upon the approval of the plan by the Department of Finance, an amount not to exceed seven hundred twenty-nine thousand dollars ($729,000) shall be made available from the Teacher Credentials Fund to the commission for the operations of the workgroup convened pursuant to Section 44320.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 50.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44321.

Student internship programs shall be joint projects of school districts and teacher preparation institutions, and such internship programs shall be submitted to the commission for approval. Approved internship programs shall be subject to periodic review by the commission.

Upon completion of an approved internship program, with district and teacher preparation institution certification, the commission shall approve the teacher intern.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44322.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the professional preparation requirements for a teaching credential may be met by certification by the Director of the Peace Corps of the United States or the Peace Corp Country Director that the applicant has satisfactorily completed not less than 18 months in a Peace Corps assignment in a foreign country, during which time 50 percent or more of his or her duties consisted of classroom teaching of resident children of the foreign country.

An applicant meeting the requirements of this section shall not be required to complete any education or methodology courses or meet any other requirement relating to professional preparation as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44323.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing school districts from hiring, employing, or otherwise using teacher aides, instructional aides, or teacher assistants under the terms of existing law and financial support formulas. The commission may study the various roles of such paraprofessionals and routinely report its findings.

Public and private colleges, universities, and community colleges may develop cooperative programs with school districts or school governing boards to place undergraduate and graduate students in public and private classrooms as teacher aides or assistants. Such assignment may be, at the discretion of the institution, the basis for securing college credit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44324.

(a) The Legislature encourages any public or private institution of higher education that conducts any program of professional preparation for a teaching or services credential to operate and supervise, within that program, a field experience program, and to grant up to and including three semester units, or the equivalent, to any student who participates in that field experience program, whether that participation occurs before or after the granting of a credential. For purposes of this section, “field experience program” means a program under which students work with truant, habitual truant, or other at-promise pupils enrolled in any public elementary or secondary school, and may include student
 participation in home-school conferences and home referrals.

(b) School districts are encouraged to cooperate with public and private institutions of higher education in the operation of the field experience programs described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 9.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. District Interns [44325. - 44328.]

44325.

(a) The commission shall issue district intern credentials authorizing persons employed by a school district that maintains kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or that maintains classes in bilingual education to provide classroom instruction to pupils in those grades and classes in accordance with the requirements of Section 44830.3. The commission also shall issue district intern credentials authorizing persons employed by a school district to provide classroom instruction to pupils in special education classes, in accordance with the requirements of Section 44830.3.

(b) Each district intern credential is valid for a period of two years. A credential may be valid for three years if the intern is participating in a program that leads to the attainment of a
 specialist credential in special education or four years if the intern is participating in a program that leads to the attainment of both a multiple subject or single subject teaching credential and a specialist credential in special education. Upon the recommendation of the school district, the commission may grant a one-year extension of the district intern credential.

(c) The commission shall require each applicant for a district intern credential to demonstrate that the applicant meets all of the following minimum qualifications for that credential:

(1) The possession of a baccalaureate degree conferred by a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(2) The successful passage of the state basic skills proficiency requirement pursuant to Sections 44252 and 44252.5.

(3) The successful completion of the appropriate subject matter examination administered by the commission, or a commission-approved subject matter preparation program for the subject areas in which the district intern is authorized to teach.

(4) The oral language component of the assessment program leading to the bilingual-crosscultural language and academic development certificate for persons seeking a district intern credential to teach bilingual education classes.

(d) The commission shall apply the requirements of Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 to each applicant for a district intern credential.

(e) The commission shall ensure that each district internship program in California provides program elements to its interns as required by the federal No
 Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 25.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44326.

(a) Persons holding district intern credentials issued by the commission under Section 44325 to teach in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or in grades 6 to 8, inclusive, in a departmentalized program, or in departmentalized bilingual classes, shall be authorized to teach in the subject area in which they have met the subject matter requirement.

(b) Persons holding district intern credentials issued by the commission under Section 44325 to teach in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, in a self-contained program or in self-contained bilingual classes and who have met the subject matter requirement shall be authorized to teach in those grades or classes.

(c) Before being assigned to teach special education pupils, persons holding district intern credentials issued by the commission under Section 44325 to teach those pupils shall meet the requirements of subdivision (b).

(d) Each district intern is required to teach with the assistance and guidance of certificated employees selected through a competitive process adopted by the governing board after consultation with the exclusive teacher representative unit or by personnel employed by institutions of higher education to supervise student teachers.

(e) A certificated employee who assists the district intern shall possess valid certification at the same level or of the same type of credential as the district interns they serve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 316, Sec. 3.   (AB 239)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44327.

On or before July 1, 1995, the commission, in consultation with participating school districts and other affected organizations, shall revise existing standards and adopt additional standards, as necessary, related to the quality of the training, support, evaluation, and performance of district interns. The standards shall be appropriate for an alternative program of teacher recruitment, preparation, and certification. Each school district with a district intern program is responsible for maintaining appropriate records of the program so that the credit earned by each district intern is transferable to his or her academic record in the same manner as if the intern had participated in a college or university program. To the extent feasible, the standards shall also be equivalent to the standards of the commission for professional preparation programs in colleges and universities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 223, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44328.

(a) Unless the commission determines that substantial evidence exists that a person is unqualified to teach, upon the completion of successful service as a district intern pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44325, and upon the recommendation of the school district governing board, the commission shall award preliminary credentials to district interns in the same manner as applicants recommended for credentials by institutions that operate approved programs of professional preparation.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44225, paragraphs (3) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259, and Sections 44261, 44265, and 44335, upon recommendation by the
 governing board, district interns shall be issued preliminary credentials upon the completion of successful service as a teacher pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44325, unless the governing board recommends, and the commission finds substantial evidence, that the person is not qualified to teach. Pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44380), teachers participating in an induction program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.1) are no longer eligible for funding under the district intern program.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 44261, the preliminary credential awarded to a district intern holding a district intern credential to teach bilingual education classes shall be a basic teaching credential with a bilingual-crosscultural language and academic development emphasis. Notwithstanding Section 44265, the preliminary credential awarded to a district intern who holds a district intern credential to teach special
 education pupils shall be a special education specialist instruction credential that authorizes the holder to teach special education pupils.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that institutions of higher education that operate approved programs of professional preparation work cooperatively with school districts that offer district intern programs for a special education specialist credential to apply the regular education coursework and fieldwork from the special education district intern program toward earning a multiple or single subject teaching credential through the institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 61.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Certificates and Credentials [44330. - 44355.]

44330.

Except where such service is provided by a school district pursuant to Section 44332.5, each county or city and county board of education may provide for the registration of any valid certification or other document authorizing the holder thereof to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications as an employee of the county superintendent of schools of such county or city and county or of a school district under the jurisdiction of such county superintendent of schools. Such registration shall authorize the service of the holder as an employee of the county superintendent of schools or of any school district under his jurisdiction in the capacity in which and for the period of time for which the certification or other document is valid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44331.

County boards of education may renew any certificate legally issued by them prior to October 1, 1945, and now in force; provided, that no certificate granted upon a credential issued by the State Board of Education or commission for a limited period shall be renewed or extended unless the credential upon which it was issued has been renewed or extended, and then only for the period of the renewal or extension of the credential.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44332.

(a) Except where that service is provided by a school district authorized to register certification documents pursuant to Section 44332.5, each county board of education or city and county board of education may issue temporary certificates for the purpose of authorizing salary payments to certified employees, including individuals certified in another state, whose credential
 applications are being processed or to personnel employed in children’s centers or other preschool educational programs whose permit applications are being processed. However, the individual must have demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills pursuant to the requirements of Section 44252.5. The applicant for the temporary certificate shall make a statement under oath that he or she has duly filed an application for a credential or permit together with the required fee and that, to the best of his or her knowledge, no reason exists why a certificate or permit should not be issued. The certificate or permit shall be valid for not more than one calendar year from the date of issuance.

(b) The county board of education or city and county board of education shall cancel the temporary certificate
 or permit immediately upon receipt of certification in writing from the commission that the applicant apparently does not possess adequate academic qualifications or apparently has a criminal record that would disqualify the applicant.

(c) A temporary certificate issued to a permit applicant is not valid beyond the time that the commission either issues or denies the originally requested permit. A temporary certificate issued to a credential applicant is not valid beyond the time that the commission provides written notification to the county board of education or city and county board of education that the applicant apparently does not possess adequate qualifications or that the commission has received facts that may cause denial of the application, or beyond the time that the commission either issues or denies the originally
 requested credential.

(d) A county board of education or city and county board of education may not issue a temporary certificate to an applicant whose teaching credential is revoked or suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 1918)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

44332.5.

(a) (1) A school district that may issue warrants pursuant to Section 42647 may, at its discretion, provide for the registration of a valid certification or other document authorizing the holder to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications as an employee of the school district.

(2) A school district shall not provide for the registration of a valid certification or other document authorizing the holder to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications as an employee of the school district until the school district has obtained
 proof that the holder has obtained a credential, certificate, or permit authorizing the performance of services in the public schools from the commission.

(b) During any period when summary criminal history information is not available from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, an applicant for an initial credential, certificate, or permit shall not be employed in a position requiring certification qualifications until he or she has met the minimum requirements for a temporary certificate of clearance. A temporary certificate of clearance or a credential, certificate, or permit authorizing service in the public schools shall be issued when the applicant has:

(1) Made full disclosure of all facts necessary to establish his or her true identity.

(2) (A) Made a statement under penalty of perjury that he or she has not been convicted of a crime that would constitute grounds for the denial of the credential, permit, or certificate applied for.

 (B) An applicant shall not be required to disclose, and the Committee of Credentials shall not inquire into or consider, any acts or omissions not related to the applicant’s fitness to teach or to perform other duties for which he or she is certificated, or that is related to his or her competence to perform the duties authorized by his or her credential.

(3) Paid to the commission the amount of twelve dollars ($12) or the fees or costs that have been or will be assessed by the Federal Bureau of
 Investigation for the issuance of its summary criminal history of the applicant when this information is once again made available to the commission. The fees authorized by this paragraph shall be applicable to all credentials, permits, and certificates that were applied for or issued after October 1, 1981.

(c) Upon receipt of a statement from the Federal Bureau of Investigation that it has no summary criminal history information on the applicant, or upon receipt of the summary criminal history information and clearance by the Committee of Credentials, a temporary certificate of clearance shall be converted to a regular certificate of clearance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 199, Sec. 3.   (AB 681)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44332.6.

(a) (1) Before issuing a temporary certificate pursuant to Section 44332, a county board of education or city and county board of education shall obtain proof that the applicant has obtained a credential, certificate, or permit authorizing the performance of services in the public schools from the commission and shall not issue a temporary certificate if the applicant has been convicted of a violent or serious felony.

(2) Before issuing a temporary certificate of clearance pursuant to Section 44332.5, a school district shall obtain proof that the applicant has obtained a credential, certificate, or permit authorizing the performance of services in the
 public schools from the commission and shall not issue a temporary certificate of clearance if the applicant has been convicted of a violent or serious felony.

(b) This section applies to any violent or serious offense that, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony.

(c) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied a temporary certificate or a temporary certificate of clearance solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a violent
 or serious
 felony if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.
